Massachusetts, session 194th, H1338.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 20 of Chapter 171 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following new sentence: Any credit 
union may compensate each of the members of the board of directors for his or her services as a 
member of the board or any committee thereof a sum that may, from time to time, be fixed by 
the members at an annual meeting. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.